Illinois, session 104th, HB5195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1119 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1119 new)8    Sec. 605-1119. Illinois Future of Energy Choice and 9Economic Impact Commission.10    (a) The General Assembly is increasingly concerned with 11energy affordability, accessibility, resilience, and choice. 12In 2021, the Climate and Equitable Jobs Act (CEJA) set forth 13guidelines to advance clean energy policy and established 14clean energy goals in both the short term and the long term. 15Since the passage of that law, there have been several 16developments in the energy space that require a continued 17analysis and evaluation of emerging challenges, changing 18technologies, and solutions that address issues of 19reliability, cost, and energy choice. Some of these 20developments include (i) rapidly growing energy demand, (ii) 21demand for new investments in existing infrastructure, (iii) 22uncertainty in energy reliability, (iv) increased costs on 23both residential customers and commercial and industrial   HB5195- 2 -LRB104 18785 HLH 32228 b1users, (v) other State actions to expand energy sources, 2including nuclear development, (vi) new innovative energy 3solutions and technologies, (vii) the existing energy industry 4workforce and future workforce needs, (viii) economic impact 5of energy policies on a local, regional, and statewide basis, 6and (ix) other critical considerations. To meet these demands 7and to address continued challenges and solutions, it is 8necessary to establish a commission of industry stakeholders 9and regulators to have regular engagements to navigate growing 10challenges, inform best practices, and advise policymakers on 11industry-informed and customer-focused solutions that embrace 12a comprehensive solution to energy policy that supports the 13State's diverse energy industry, understands the needs of 14employers, energy industry stakeholders, and customers, and 15offers necessary, reasonable policy recommendations.16    (b) The Illinois Future of Energy Choice and Economic 17Impact Commission is hereby created.18    (c) The Commission shall consist of the following members:19        (1) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 20    President of the Senate;21        (2) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 22    Minority Leader of the Senate;23        (3) one member of the House of Representatives, 24    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;25        (4) one member of the House of Representatives, 26    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of   HB5195- 3 -LRB104 18785 HLH 32228 b1    Representatives;2        (5) the Director of the Illinois Power Agency or his 3    or her designee;4        (6) the Chairman of the Illinois Commerce Commission 5    or his or her designee;6        (7) the Director of the Illinois Environmental 7    Protection Agency or his or her designee;8        (8) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9    or his or her designee; the person serving under this item 10    (8) shall serve as the Chair of the Commission;11        (9) 2 members representing natural gas utilities, 12    appointed by the Director of Commerce and Economic 13    Opportunity;14        (10) 2 members representing electric utilities, 15    appointed by the Director of Commerce and Economic 16    Opportunity;17        (11) one member representing a statewide organization 18    representing regulated municipalities and cooperatives, 19    appointed by the Director of Commerce and Economic 20    Opportunity;21        (12) 2 members representing a statewide business 22    organization, appointed by the Director of Commerce and 23    Economic Opportunity;24        (13) 2 members representing a statewide labor 25    organization, appointed by the Director of Commerce and 26    Economic Opportunity;  HB5195- 4 -LRB104 18785 HLH 32228 b1        (14) one member representing the nuclear power 2    industry in Illinois, appointed by the Director of 3    Commerce and Economic Opportunity;4        (15) one member representing a trade association that 5    represents wind and solar electric generators, renewable 6    transmission companies, and storage companies, appointed 7    by the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity; and8        (16) up to 2 additional members with expertise in 9    energy policy, appointed by the Director of Commerce and 10    Economic Opportunity, from the private sector or an 11    institution of higher education in Illinois.12    (d) The members of the Commission shall serve without 13compensation.14    (e) The Commission shall meet at least quarterly to 15fulfill its duties under this Act.16    (f) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 17shall provide administrative support to the Commission.18    (g) The Commission shall have the following duties:19        (1) to analyze the feasibility of the State continuing 20    to be a net exporter of energy, including identifying any 21    limitations or possible burdens that may impact energy 22    generation or delivery in Illinois and, if there are 23    policies, either regulatory or statutory, in place that 24    impact the State's ability to continue being a net 25    exporter of energy, to identify solutions to prevent those 26    policies from having further negative impact on the State;  HB5195- 5 -LRB104 18785 HLH 32228 b1        (2) to analyze the impact of current energy policies 2    on the State's economy, including identifying any negative 3    impacts on workers in Illinois who are employed by 4    utilities or energy sector industries that are reliant 5    upon diverse energy sources, including natural gas, 6    electricity, nuclear, and other sectors;7        (3) to consider the viability of existing energy 8    policies, adopted either through rule or legislation, that 9    may be negatively impacting the State's ability to meet 10    energy demands, support affordable energy prices, or 11    support direct or indirect energy jobs; the Commission 12    shall make recommendations to the Governor and the General 13    Assembly for reasonable delays or elimination of certain 14    established energy policy timelines, retirements, or 15    disruptions;16        (4) to generate recommendations or studies that may 17    help inform future energy policy decisions based on 18    actual, pessimistic, and optimistic forecasts concerning 19    impacts on Illinois energy affordability, energy choices, 20    workforce, economic development, resource adequacy, energy 21    efficiency, and energy demands;22        (5) to study all sources related to or impacting 23    energy costs in Illinois, looking to industry data and 24    other sources that may provide insights into possible 25    regulations, policies, or federal, State, or local 26    pressures on the industry or customers;  HB5195- 6 -LRB104 18785 HLH 32228 b1        (6) to allow for public comments to be submitted on 2    behalf of individuals, organizations, or other 3    stakeholders that may help inform the work of the 4    Commission; and5        (7) to identify opportunities and barriers to ensure 6    that State agencies are endorsing an inclusive approach to 7    energy policy that reasonably supports existing energy 8    sources and infrastructure and explores new technologies.9    (h) The Commission shall report to the Governor and the 10General Assembly by December 1 of each year on its activities, 11findings, and recommendations.12    (i) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2030. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.